Mississippi, session 2026, SB2169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the University of Mississippi Medical Center for the purpose of building a fire station with the City of Jackson Fire Department to provide primary response to the UMMC campus and other state property for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................... $10,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer, and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.